Utah statutes.
63G-7-201.   Immunity of governmental entities from suit.
(1)  Except as may be otherwise provided in this chapter, each governmental
entity and each employee of a governmental entity are immune from suit for any
injury that results from the exercise of a governmental function.
(2)  Notwithstanding the waiver of immunity provisions of Section 63G-7-301, a
governmental entity, its officers, and its employees are immune from suit for
any injury or damage resulting from the implementation of or the failure to
implement measures to:
(a)  control the causes of epidemic and communicable diseases and other
conditions significantly affecting the public health or necessary to protect
the public health as set out in Title 26A, Chapter 1, Local Health
Departments;
(b)  investigate and control suspected bioterrorism and disease as set out in
Title 26, Chapter 23b, Detection of Public Health Emergencies Act; and
(c)  respond to a national, state, or local emergency, a public health
emergency as defined in Section 26-23b-102, or a declaration by the President
of the United States or other federal official requesting public health
related activities.
